Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 56, O.S.L. 2025
(36 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6224), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6224. Under any method of compensation, the total
commission payable to a public insurance adjuster, including
expenses, direct costs, or any other costs accrued by the public
insurance adjuster, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) or One
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), whichever is less, of the
amount of the insurance settlement when adjusting for entities

Req. No. 15195 Page 1

subj ect to The Governmental Tort Claims Act, Section 151 et seq. of
Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15195 MJ 12/18/25



















Req. No. 15195 Page 2